testing/smn-tests.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: smn/bin/ismn.hfst
    Morph: smn/bin/smn.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: smn/bin/ismn.fst
    Morph: smn/bin/smn.fst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - njamma: # a-stems
    njamma+N+Sg+Nom: njamma
    njamma+N+Sg+Gen: njama
    njamma+N+Sg+Acc: njama
    njamma+N+Sg+Ill: njaman
    njamma+N+Sg+Loc: njammaast
    njamma+N+Sg+Com: njammaain
    njamma+N+Ess: njamman
    njamma+N+Par: njammad
    njamma+N+Pl+Nom: njamah
    njamma+N+Pl+Gen: njammai
    njamma+N+Pl+Acc: njammaid
    njamma+N+Pl+Ill: njammaid
    njamma+N+Pl+Loc: njammain
    njamma+N+Pl+Com: njamaijgijn
    njamma+N+Pl+Abe: njamaittáá

  Noun - hattâ: # â-stems XXX
    hattâ+N+Sg+Nom: hattâ
    hattâ+N+Sg+Gen: haatâ
    hattâ+N+Sg+Acc: haatâ
    hattâ+N+Sg+Ill: haatân
    hattâ+N+Sg+Loc: haatâst
    hattâ+N+Sg+Com: hattáin
    hattâ+N+Ess: hattân
    hattâ+N+Par: hattâd
    hattâ+N+Pl+Nom: hatah
    hattâ+N+Pl+Gen: [haatâi, hatâi]
    hattâ+N+Pl+Acc: [haatâid, haattâid]
    hattâ+N+Pl+Ill: [haattáid, haatááid]
    hattâ+N+Pl+Loc: [haatâin, haattâin]
    hattâ+N+Pl+Com: [hatáigijn, hatáiguim]
    hattâ+N+Pl+Abe: hatâittáá

  Noun - kietâ: # â-stems
    kietâ+N+Sg+Nom: kietâ
    kietâ+N+Sg+Gen: kieđâ
    kietâ+N+Sg+Acc: kieđâ
    kietâ+N+Sg+Ill: kietân
    kietâ+N+Sg+Loc: kieđâst
    kietâ+N+Sg+Com: [kieđáin, kieđááin]
    kietâ+N+Ess: kiettân
    kietâ+N+Par: kiettâd
    kietâ+N+Pl+Nom: kieđâh
    kietâ+N+Pl+Gen: kieđâi
    kietâ+N+Pl+Acc: kieđâid
    kietâ+N+Pl+Ill: [kietáid, kietáid]
    kietâ+N+Pl+Loc: kieđâin
    kietâ+N+Pl+Com: [kieđâigijn, kieđâiguim]
    kietâ+N+Pl+Abe: kieđâittáá

  Noun - lostâ: # â-stems
    lostâ+N+Sg+Nom: lostâ
    lostâ+N+Sg+Gen: loostâ
    lostâ+N+Sg+Acc: loostâ
    lostâ+N+Sg+Ill: loostân
    lostâ+N+Sg+Loc: loostâst
    lostâ+N+Sg+Com: [lostáin, lostááin]
    lostâ+N+Sg+Abe: lostâttáá
    lostâ+N+Ess: lostân
    lostâ+N+Par: lostâd
    lostâ+N+Pl+Nom: loostâh
    lostâ+N+Pl+Gen: loostâi
    lostâ+N+Pl+Acc: loostâid
    lostâ+N+Pl+Ill: [loostáid, loostááid]
    lostâ+N+Pl+Loc: loostâin
    lostâ+N+Pl+Com: [lostâigijn, lostaiguim]
    lostâ+N+Pl+Abe: lostâittáá

  Noun - nuorâ: # â-stems
    nuorâ+A+Sg+Nom: nuorâ
    nuorâ+A+Sg+Gen: nuorâ
    nuorâ+A+Sg+Acc: nuorâ
    nuorâ+A+Sg+Ill: nuorân
    nuorâ+A+Sg+Loc: nuorâst
    nuorâ+A+Sg+Com: [nuoráin, nuorááin]
    nuorâ+A+Sg+Abe: nuorâttáá
    nuorâ+A+Ess: nuorân
    nuorâ+A+Par: nuorâd
    nuorâ+A+Pl+Nom: nuorâh
    nuorâ+A+Pl+Gen: nuorâi
    nuorâ+A+Pl+Acc: nuorâid
    nuorâ+A+Pl+Ill: [nuoráid, nuorááid]
    nuorâ+A+Pl+Loc: nuorâin
    nuorâ+A+Pl+Com: [nuorâigijn, nuorâiguim]
    nuorâ+A+Pl+Abe: nuorâittáá

  Noun - pappâ: # â-stems
    pappâ+N+Sg+Nom: pappâ
    pappâ+N+Sg+Gen: paapâ
    pappâ+N+Sg+Acc: paapâ
    pappâ+N+Sg+Ill: paapân
    pappâ+N+Sg+Loc: [paapâst, paappâst]
    pappâ+N+Sg+Com: [paapáin, paappááin]
    pappâ+N+Sg+Abe: papattáá
    pappâ+N+Ess: pappân
    pappâ+N+Par: pappâd
    pappâ+N+Pl+Nom: paapâh
    pappâ+N+Pl+Gen: [paapâi, papâi]
    pappâ+N+Pl+Acc: [paapâid, paappâid]
    pappâ+N+Pl+Ill: [pappáid, pappááid]
    pappâ+N+Pl+Loc: [paapâin, paappâin]
    pappâ+N+Pl+Com: [papâigijn, papâiguim]
    pappâ+N+Pl+Abe: papâittáá

  Noun - čááná: # á-stems
    čááná+N+Sg+Nom: čááná
    čááná+N+Sg+Gen: čááná
    čááná+N+Sg+Acc: čááná
    čááná+N+Sg+Ill: [čáánán, čáánân]
    čááná+N+Sg+Loc: čáánáást
    čááná+N+Sg+Com: [čáánáin, čáánááin]
    čááná+N+Sg+Abe: čánáttáá
    čááná+N+Ess: čáánnán
    čááná+N+Par: čáánnád
    čááná+N+Pl+Nom: čáánáh
    čááná+N+Pl+Gen: [čáánái, čánái]
    čááná+N+Pl+Acc: čáánáid
    čááná+N+Pl+Ill: [čáánáid, čáánááid]
    čááná+N+Pl+Loc: čáánáin
    čááná+N+Pl+Com: [čánáigijn, čánáiguim]
    čááná+N+Pl+Abe: čánáittáá

  Noun - kiälkká: # á-stems
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Nom: kiälkká
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Gen: kiälhá
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Acc: kiälhá
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Ill: [kiälkán, kiälkân]
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Loc: [kiälhást, kiälhâst]
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Com: [kiälháin, kiälhááin]
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Abe: kiälháttáá
    kiälkká+N+Ess: kiälkkán
    kiälkká+N+Par: kiälkkád
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Nom: kiälháh
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Gen: kiälhái
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Acc: kiälháid
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Ill: [kiälháid, kiälhááid]
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Loc: kiälháin
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Com: [kiälháigijn, kiälháiguim]
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Abe: kiälháittáá

  Noun - kaasi: # i-stems
    kaasi+N+Sg+Nom: kaasi
    kaasi+N+Sg+Gen: kaasi
    kaasi+N+Sg+Acc: kaasi
    kaasi+N+Sg+Ill: kaasin
    kaasi+N+Sg+Loc: [kaasist, kaassist]
    kaasi+N+Sg+Com: [kasijn, kasiijn]
    kaasi+N+Sg+Abe: kasittáá
    kaasi+N+Ess: kaassin
    kaasi+N+Par: kaassid
    kaasi+N+Pl+Nom: kaasih
    kaasi+N+Pl+Gen: kaasij
    kaasi+N+Pl+Acc: [kaasijd, kaassijd]
    kaasi+N+Pl+Ill: [kaasijd, kaasiijd]
    kaasi+N+Pl+Loc: kaasijn
    kaasi+N+Pl+Com: [kaasiigijn, kaasiiguim]
    kaasi+N+Pl+Abe: kaasiittáá

  Noun - kumppi: # i-stems
    kumppi+N+Sg+Nom: kumppi
    kumppi+N+Sg+Gen: kuumpi
    kumppi+N+Sg+Acc: kuumpi
    kumppi+N+Sg+Ill: kuumpin
    kumppi+N+Sg+Loc: kuumpist
    kumppi+N+Sg+Com: [kumppijn, kumppiijn]
    kumppi+N+Sg+Abe: kumpittáá
    kumppi+N+Ess: kumppin
    kumppi+N+Par: kumppid
    kumppi+N+Pl+Nom: kuumpih
    kumppi+N+Pl+Gen: [kumpij, kuumpij]
    kumppi+N+Pl+Acc: kuumpijd
    kumppi+N+Pl+Ill: [kuumpijd, kuumpiijd]
    kumppi+N+Pl+Loc: kuumpijn
    kumppi+N+Pl+Com: [kumpijgijn, kumpijguim]
    kumppi+N+Pl+Abe: kumpijttáá

  Noun - vuoli: # i-stems
    vuoli+N+Sg+Nom: vuoli
    vuoli+N+Sg+Gen: vuoli
    vuoli+N+Sg+Acc: vuoli
    vuoli+N+Sg+Ill: vuolin
    vuoli+N+Sg+Loc: vuolist
    vuoli+N+Sg+Com: [vuolijn, vuoliijn]
    vuoli+N+Sg+Abe: vuolittáá
    vuoli+N+Ess: vuollin
    vuoli+N+Par: vuollid
    vuoli+N+Pl+Nom: vuolih
    vuoli+N+Pl+Gen: vuolij
    vuoli+N+Pl+Acc: vuolijd
    vuoli+N+Pl+Ill: [vuolijd, vuoliijd]
    vuoli+N+Pl+Loc: vuolijn
    vuoli+N+Pl+Com: [vuolijgijn, vuolijguim]
    vuoli+N+Pl+Abe: vuolijttáá

  Noun - ito: # o-stems
    ito+N+Sg+Nom: ito
    ito+N+Sg+Gen: iđo
    ito+N+Sg+Acc: iđo
    ito+N+Sg+Ill: iton
    ito+N+Sg+Loc: iiđoost
    ito+N+Sg+Com: [iđoin, iđooin]
    ito+N+Sg+Abe: iđottáá
    ito+N+Ess: ittoon
    ito+N+Par: ittood
    ito+N+Pl+Nom: iđoh
    ito+N+Pl+Gen: iđoi
    ito+N+Pl+Acc: iiđoid
    ito+N+Pl+Ill: [iiđoid, iđooid]
    ito+N+Pl+Loc: iiđoin
    ito+N+Pl+Com: [iđoigijn, iđoiguim]
    ito+N+Pl+Abe: iđoittáá

  Noun - humo: # o-stems
    humo+N+Sg+Nom: humo
    humo+N+Sg+Gen: humo
    humo+N+Sg+Acc: humo
    humo+N+Sg+Ill: humon
    humo+N+Sg+Loc: huumoost
    humo+N+Sg+Com: [huumoin, huumooin]
    humo+N+Sg+Abe: humottáá
    humo+N+Ess: hummoon
    humo+N+Par: hummood
    humo+N+Pl+Nom: humoh
    humo+N+Pl+Gen: humoi
    humo+N+Pl+Acc: humoid
    humo+N+Pl+Ill: [humoid, humooid]
    humo+N+Pl+Loc: humoin
    humo+N+Pl+Com: [humoigijn, humoiguim]
    humo+N+Pl+Abe: humoittáá

  Noun - tobdo: # o-stems
    tobdo+N+Sg+Nom: tobdo
    tobdo+N+Sg+Gen: tobdo
    tobdo+N+Sg+Acc: tobdo
    tobdo+N+Sg+Ill: toobdon
    tobdo+N+Sg+Loc: tobdoost
    tobdo+N+Sg+Com: [tobdoin, tobdooin]
    tobdo+N+Sg+Abe: tobdottáá
    tobdo+N+Ess: tobdon
    tobdo+N+Par: tobdod
    tobdo+N+Pl+Nom: tobdoh
    tobdo+N+Pl+Gen: tobdoi
    tobdo+N+Pl+Acc: tobdoid
    tobdo+N+Pl+Ill: [tobdoid, tobdooid]
    tobdo+N+Pl+Loc: tobdoin
    tobdo+N+Pl+Com: [tobdoigijn, tobdoiguim]
    tobdo+N+Pl+Abe: tobdoittáá

  Noun - vašo: # o-stems
    vašo+N+Sg+Nom: vašo
    vašo+N+Sg+Gen: vašo
    vašo+N+Sg+Acc: vašo
    vašo+N+Sg+Ill: vašon
    vašo+N+Sg+Loc: vaššoost
    vašo+N+Sg+Com: [vaššoin, vaššooin]
    vašo+N+Sg+Abe: vašottáá
    vašo+N+Ess: vaššoon
    vašo+N+Par: vaššood
    vašo+N+Pl+Nom: vašoh
    vašo+N+Pl+Gen: vašoi
    vašo+N+Pl+Acc: vašoid
    vašo+N+Pl+Ill: [vaššoid, vaššooid]
    vašo+N+Pl+Loc: [vašoin, vaššoin]
    vašo+N+Pl+Com: [vašoigijn, vašoiguim]
    vašo+N+Pl+Abe: vašoittáá

  Noun - lamppu: # o-stems
    lamppu+N+Sg+Nom: lamppu
    lamppu+N+Sg+Gen: laampu
    lamppu+N+Sg+Acc: laampu
    lamppu+N+Sg+Ill: laampun
    lamppu+N+Sg+Loc: laampust
    lamppu+N+Sg+Com: [lamppuin, lamppuuin]
    lamppu+N+Sg+Abe: lamputtáá
    lamppu+N+Ess: lamppun
    lamppu+N+Par: lamppud
    lamppu+N+Pl+Nom: laampuh
    lamppu+N+Pl+Gen: laampui
    lamppu+N+Pl+Acc: laampuid
    lamppu+N+Pl+Ill: [lamppuid, lamppuuid]
    lamppu+N+Pl+Loc: laampuin
    lamppu+N+Pl+Com: [lampuigijn, lampuiguim]
    lamppu+N+Pl+Abe: lampuittáá





  Noun - sollâ: # â-stems
    sollâ+N+Sg+Nom: sollâ
    sollâ+N+Sg+Gen: soolâ
    sollâ+N+Sg+Ill: soolân
    sollâ+N+Sg+Loc: soolâst
    sollâ+N+Sg+Com: sooláin
    sollâ+N+Ess: sollân
    sollâ+N+Pl+Abe: solâittáá

  Noun - kielâ: # â-stems
    kielâ+N+Sg+Nom: kielâ
    kielâ+N+Sg+Gen: kielâ
    kielâ+N+Sg+Ill: kielân
    kielâ+N+Sg+Loc: kielâst
    kielâ+N+Sg+Com: kieláin
    kielâ+N+Ess: kiellân
    kielâ+N+Pl+Abe: kielâittáá

  Noun - vuoli: # i-stems
    vuoli+N+Sg+Nom: vuoli
    vuoli+N+Sg+Gen: vuoli
    vuoli+N+Sg+Ill: vuolin
    vuoli+N+Sg+Loc: vuolist
    vuoli+N+Sg+Com: vuolijn
    vuoli+N+Ess: vuollin
    vuoli+N+Pl+Abe: vuolijttáá

  Noun - šaalu: # u-stems
    šaalu+N+Sg+Nom: šaalu
    šaalu+N+Sg+Gen: šaalu
    šaalu+N+Sg+Ill: šaalun
    šaalu+N+Sg+Loc: šaalust
    šaalu+N+Sg+Com: šaaluin
    šaalu+N+Ess: šaallun
    šaalu+N+Pl+Abe: šaluittáá

  Noun - mielgâ: # â-stems
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Nom: mielgâ
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Gen: mielgâ
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Ill: mielgân
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Loc: mielgâst
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Com: mielgáin
    mielgâ+N+Ess: mielgân
    mielgâ+N+Pl+Abe: mielgâittáá

  Noun - tullâ: # â-stems
    tullâ+N+Sg+Nom: tullâ
    tullâ+N+Sg+Gen: tuulâ
    tullâ+N+Sg+Ill: tuulân
    tullâ+N+Sg+Loc: tuulâst
    tullâ+N+Sg+Com: tuuláin
    tullâ+N+Ess: tullân
    tullâ+N+Pl+Abe: tulâittáá

  Noun - tuppâ: # â-stems
    tuppâ+N+Sg+Nom: tuppâ
    tuppâ+N+Sg+Gen: tuuvâ
    tuppâ+N+Sg+Ill: tuuvân
    tuppâ+N+Sg+Loc: tuuvâst
    tuppâ+N+Sg+Com: tuuváin
    tuppâ+N+Ess: tuppân
    tuppâ+N+Pl+Abe: tupâittáá

  Noun - luččâ: # â-stems
    luččâ+N+Sg+Nom: luččâ
    luččâ+N+Sg+Gen: luujâ
    luččâ+N+Sg+Ill: luujân
    luččâ+N+Sg+Loc: luujâst
    luččâ+N+Sg+Com: luujáin
    luččâ+N+Ess: luččân
    luččâ+N+Pl+Abe: lujâittáá

  Noun - ruttâ: # â-stems
    ruttâ+N+Sg+Nom: ruttâ
    ruttâ+N+Sg+Gen: ruuđâ
    ruttâ+N+Sg+Ill: ruutân
    ruttâ+N+Sg+Loc: ruuđâst
    ruttâ+N+Sg+Com: ruuđáin
    ruttâ+N+Ess: ruttân
    ruttâ+N+Pl+Abe: ruđâittáá

  Noun - paavuotâ: # â-stems
    paavuotâ+N+Sg+Nom: paavuotâ
    paavuotâ+N+Sg+Gen: paavuođâ
    paavuotâ+N+Sg+Ill: paavuotân
    paavuotâ+N+Sg+Loc: paavuođâst
    paavuotâ+N+Sg+Com: paavuođáin
    paavuotâ+N+Ess: paavuottân
    paavuotâ+N+Pl+Abe: paavuođâittáá

  Noun - kussâ: # â-stems XXX loc
    kussâ+N+Sg+Nom: kussâ
    kussâ+N+Sg+Gen: kuusâ
    kussâ+N+Sg+Ill: kuusân
    kussâ+N+Sg+Loc: kuussâst
    kussâ+N+Sg+Com: kussáin
    kussâ+N+Ess: kussân
    kussâ+N+Pl+Abe: kusâittáá

  Noun - kuosâ: # â-stems
    kuosâ+N+Sg+Nom: kuosâ
    kuosâ+N+Sg+Gen: kuosâ
    kuosâ+N+Sg+Ill: kuosân
    kuosâ+N+Sg+Loc: kuosâst
    kuosâ+N+Sg+Com: kuosáin
    kuosâ+N+Ess: kuossân
    kuosâ+N+Pl+Abe: kuosâittáá

  Noun - pino: # â-stems
    pino+N+Sg+Nom: pino
    pino+N+Sg+Gen: pino
    pino+N+Sg+Ill: pinon
    pino+N+Sg+Loc: piinoost
    pino+N+Sg+Com: piinooin
    pino+N+Ess: pinnoon
    pino+N+Pl+Abe: pinoittáá

  Noun - ritá: # â-stems
    ritá+N+Sg+Nom: ritá
    ritá+N+Sg+Gen: riđá
    ritá+N+Sg+Ill: riitán
    ritá+N+Sg+Loc: riiđáást
    ritá+N+Sg+Com: riiđáin
    ritá+N+Ess: rittáán
    ritá+N+Pl+Abe: riđáittáá

  Noun - lasa: # â-stems
    lasa+N+Sg+Nom: lasa
    lasa+N+Sg+Gen: lasa
    lasa+N+Sg+Ill: lasan
    lasa+N+Sg+Loc: lassaast
    lasa+N+Sg+Com: lassaain
    lasa+N+Ess: lassan
    lasa+N+Pl+Abe: lasaittáá

  Noun - stihá: # â-stems
    stihá+N+Sg+Nom: stihá
    stihá+N+Sg+Gen: stivá
    stihá+N+Sg+Ill: stihán
    stihá+N+Sg+Loc: stivváást
    stihá+N+Sg+Com: stivváin
    stihá+N+Ess: stihháán
    stihá+N+Pl+Abe: stiváittáá
